South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3611.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created a study committee to study the potential impacts of Medicaid expansion in the State of South Carolina including, but not limited to, impacts on access to healthcare, healthcare utilization, health outcomes and financial security, employment and education gains, medical debt, unreimbursed healthcare services, and state budget and fiscal policy. (B) The study committee shall provide a report that addresses the areas of examination set forth in subsection (A), including a statistical analysis of the data with related findings, and make recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or policy changes with regard to Medicaid expansion. (C)(1) The study committee is composed of five members, consisting of: (a) the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services, or a designee; (b) a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (c) a member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate; (d) a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the House Minority Leader; and (e) a member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Minority Leader. (2) A vacancy in the membership of the study committee must be filled in the manner of original appointment. (3) Members of the committee shall serve without per diem, mileage, or other compensation generally provided to members of boards and commissions. (D)(1) The Ways and Means Committee shall provide appropriate staffing for the study committee. (2) The study committee may obtain data or other information from state agencies that is relevant to the purposes of this study committee; provided, however, only aggregated data with no personally identifiable data may be obtained by the study committee. Any state agency that receives a request pursuant to this joint resolution shall respond promptly and provide the requested data or other information. (3) The study committee may invite individuals with expertise or relevant experience in matters related to the purposes of this study committee to provide testimony for consideration in preparing the study committee's report. (E) The study committee shall provide a report with findings and recommendations to the General Assembly by January 1, 2026. The study committee shall dissolve upon providing its report to the General Assembly or on January 1, 2026, whichever occurs first. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----